Washington statutes.
RCW 9.04.090

Advertising fuel prices by service stations.

It is unlawful for any dealer or service station, as both are defined in *RCW 82.36.010, to advertise by publication, dissemination, display, or whatever means:

(1) A price per unit of fuel that is expressed in a unit of measurement different from that employed by the pump or other device used to dispense the fuel, unless the price is advertised for both units of measurement in the same fashion; or

(2) A price per unit of fuel that is conditioned upon the purchase of another product, unless the conditional language, name, and price of the other product are clearly expressed in the advertisement in characters at least one-half the height of the characters used to advertise the fuel price.

Violation of this section is a misdemeanor and is subject to the provisions of RCW 9.04.060 through 9.04.080.

[ 1983 c 114 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 82.36.010 was amended by 1998 c 176 s 6, deleting the definition of "service station." RCW 82.36.010 was subsequently amended by 2007 c 515 s 1, deleting the definition of "dealer." Chapter 82.36 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2013 c 225 s 501, effective July 1, 2016.